Nevada, session 83, AB559.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Office of the Extradition Coordinator within the Office
of the Attorney General the sum of $1,518,208 for an unanticipated
shortfall related to extradition costs. This appropriation is
supplemental to that made by section 4 of chapter 209, Statutes of
Nevada 2023, at page 1235.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)